Washington statutes.
RCW 9.92.020

Punishment of gross misdemeanor when not fixed by statute.

Every person convicted of a gross misdemeanor for which no punishment is prescribed in any statute in force at the time of conviction and sentence, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a maximum term fixed by the court of up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more than five thousand dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine.

[ 2011 c 96 s 10; 1982 1st ex.s. c 47 s 6; 1909 c 249 s 15; RRS s 2267.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.

Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 47: See note following RCW 9.41.190.